Maryland, session 2026, HB0459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
2–205.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0459*

HOUSE BILL 459
(a) In addition to the other powers granted and duties imposed under this article,
the State Board has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(d) The State Board may institute legal proceedings to enforce:
(1) The provisions of this article that are within its jurisdiction; and
(2) The bylaws, rules, and regulations adopted by the Board.
(e) (1) Without charge and with the advice of the Attorney General, the State
Board shall explain the true intent and meaning of the provisions of:
(i) This article that are within its jurisdiction; and
(ii) The bylaws, rules, and regulations adopted by the Board.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph [(4)] (5) of this subsection and in Title
6, Subtitles 4 and 5 of this article, the Board shall decide all controversies and disputes
under these provisions.
(3) (I) IN AN APPEAL TO THE STATE BOARD OF A DECISION OF A
COUNTY BOARD REGARDING A LOCAL POLICY OR A CONTROVERSY AND DISPUTE
REGARDING THE RULES AND REGULATIONS OF THE COUNTY BOARD, THE STANDARD
OF REVIEW SHALL BE AN ABUSE OF DISCRETION OR ILLEGALITY.
(II) A DECISION OF A COUNTY BOARD MAY BE AN ABUSE OF
DISCRETION IF:
1. NO REASONABLE PERSON WOULD TAKE THE VIEW
ADOPTED BY THE COUNTY BOARD;
2. THE COUNTY BOARD ACTS WITHOUT REFERENCE TO
ANY GUIDING RULE OR PRINCIPLE; OR
3. THE DECISION IS CLEARLY AGAINST THE LOGIC AND
EFFECT OF FACTS AND INFERENCES BEFORE THE COUNTY BOARD.
[(3)] (4) The decision of the Board is final.
[(4)] (5) (i) The Public Employee Relations Board shall decide any
controversy or dispute arising under Title 6, Subtitle 4 or Subtitle 5 of this article.
(ii) A decision of the Public Employee Relations Board is final.

HOUSE BILL 459 3
2–303.
(a) In addition to the other powers granted and duties imposed under this article,
the State Superintendent has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(b) (1) The State Superintendent shall enforce the provisions of:
(i) This article that are within [his] THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S jurisdiction; and
(ii) The bylaws, rules, and regulations of the State Board.
(2) IF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT ORDERS A STAY OF AN ACTION
TAKEN BY A COUNTY BOARD BY RULE, REGULATION, RESOLUTION, BYLAW, OR
OTHER ORDER AND THE ACTION IS APPEALED TO THE COUNTY BOARD OR THE STATE
BOARD, THE STAY MAY NOT EXCEED 90 DAYS IN DURATION, BUT MAY BE DISSOLVED
AT ANY TIME BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OR THE STATE BOARD.
[(2)] (3) If an educational institution, a county board, or a nonpublic
prekindergarten program, or nonpublic school subject to the requirements of § 26–704 of
this article violates any of these provisions, the State Superintendent, by written notice,
may require the State Comptroller to withhold from that institution, board, program, or
school:
(i) All or any part of an appropriation made by the General
Assembly; and
(ii) All or any part of any other payment from funds budgeted by the
State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.